Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-314 of Title 14A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Lenders shall disclose to a debtor, to whom a loan is made,
the interest rate on the loan, whether it a fixed or variable
interest rate, and a table of all other charges and fees associated
with the loan.
B. The disclosure required under subsection A of this section
shall be made on the first page of the loan documents and the lender
shall require the debtor to sign or initial the disclosure affirming
that they have read and understood all charges, fees, and interest
related to the loan.
Req. No. 11574 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11574 AQH 12/13/24





















Req. No. 11574 Page 2